Utah statutes.
58-11a-303.   Terms of license -- Expiration -- Renewal.

(1) (a)  The division shall issue each license under this chapter in accordance with a two-year renewal cycle established by rule, except that an instructor license is a one-time certificate and does not expire unless the licensee fails to keep current the license that qualified the licensee to be an instructor under Section 58-11a-302.

(b)  The division may by rule extend or shorten a renewal period by as much as one year to stagger the renewal cycles it administers.

(2)  At the time of renewal, a licensed school shall show satisfactory evidence that the school meets the standards for that type of school, including staff, curriculum, and accreditation requirements, established by rule.

(3)  Each license expires on the expiration date shown on the license unless the licensee renews it in accordance with Section 58-1-308.



Amended by Chapter 204, 2001 General Session

